Utah statutes.
78B-9-109.   Appointment of pro bono counsel.
(1)  If any portion of the petition is not summarily dismissed, the court may,
upon the request of an indigent petitioner, appoint counsel on a pro bono
basis to represent the petitioner in the post-conviction court or on post-
conviction appeal.  Counsel who represented the petitioner at trial or on the
direct appeal may not be appointed to represent the petitioner under this
section.
(2)  In determining whether to appoint counsel, the court shall consider the
following factors:
(a)  whether the petition or the appeal contains factual allegations that will
require an evidentiary hearing; and
(b)  whether the petition involves complicated issues of law or fact that
require the assistance of counsel for proper adjudication.
(3)  An allegation that counsel appointed under this section was ineffective
cannot be the basis for relief in any subsequent post-conviction petition.
